Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB327.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15A.066 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) An[No] employee of the Department of Juvenile Justice shall not be required
to give personal attendance as a witness in any civil action[suit] arising out of
or related to his or her employment[,] outside[out of] the county of that
employee's assigned work station except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.[, but ]
(b) This subsection shall not preclude taking his or her testimony by deposition
or as otherwise provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure[ shall be taken] in
lieu of personal attendance.[thereof; however, ]
(2) If the court in which the civil action is pending finds that the witness is a necessary
witness for trial, that court may order the personal attendance of the witness at trial.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 9:15 AM Jacketed